Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1401.27
Motor vehicle, motorcycle, or
trailer salesperson, defined.

Motor vehicle, motorcycle, or trailer salesperson means
any person who, for a salary, commission, or compensation of any kind, is
employed directly by only one specified licensed Nebraska motor vehicle dealer,
motorcycle dealer, or trailer dealer, except when the salesperson is working
for two or more dealerships with common ownership, to sell, purchase, or exchange
or to negotiate for the sale, purchase, or exchange of motor vehicles, motorcycles,
or trailers. A person owning any part of more than one dealership may be a
salesperson for each of such dealerships. For purposes of this section, common
ownership means that there is at least an eighty percent interest in each
dealership by one or more persons having ownership in such dealership.

Laws 2010, LB816, § 39.